Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.295

Annexation of unincorporated island of territory within code city—Resolution—Notice of hearing.

(1) The legislative body of a code city may resolve to annex territory to the city if there is within the city, unincorporated territory:

(a) Containing less than one hundred seventy-five acres and having all of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the code city; or

(b) Of any size containing residential property owners and having at least eighty percent of the boundaries of such area contiguous to the city. Territory annexed under this subsection (1)(b) must be within the same county and within the same urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110, and the city must plan under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(2) The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the area to be annexed, state the number of voters residing therein as nearly as may be, and set a date for a public hearing on such resolution for annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of the resolution at least once a week for two weeks prior to the date of the hearing, in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the code city and one or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be annexed.

(3) For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, territory bounded by a river, lake, or other body of water is considered contiguous to a city that is also bounded by the same river, lake, or other body of water.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 27 s 1; 2013 c 333 s 1; 1997 c 429 s 36; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.295.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 27: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 28, 2013." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 27 s 4.]

Severability—1997 c 429: See note following RCW 36.70A.3201.